District of Columbia statutes.
16-1118

Judgment for damages in excess of improvements.

When the damages of the plaintiff, assessed as provided by section 16-1116 , exceed the value of the permanent improvements as ascertained by the jury, the plaintiff shall be entitled to a judgment for the excess in like manner as directed by section 16-1109 .

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 567, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-1118.
1973 Ed., § 16-1118.